Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 3. ELECTION OFFICERS AND OBSERVERS

CHAPTER 34. STATE INSPECTORS

Sec. 34.001. APPOINTMENT OF STATE INSPECTORS. (a) The secretary of state may appoint one or more state inspectors for an election.

(b) The secretary of state shall appoint one or more inspectors for an election if the secretary receives a written request for the appointment from 15 or more registered voters:

(1) of the county for which the inspector is requested, for an election ordered by the governor or a county authority or for a primary election; or

(2) of the political subdivision in which the election specified by the request is held, for an election ordered by an authority of a political subdivision other than a county.

(c) A request under Subsection (b) must be received by the secretary of state not later than the fourth regular business day before the date of the election for which the inspectors are requested. The request is not available for public inspection until the day after election day.

(d) State inspectors are responsible to the secretary of state and subject to the secretary's direction. The secretary may terminate an appointment at any time.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 728, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 41, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 34.002. DUTIES AND PRIVILEGES. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a state inspector is entitled to be present at and observe any function or activity at a polling place, central counting station, place of canvass, or other place at which official election or voter registration functions or activities take place. An inspector may take reasonable steps to obtain evidence of the manner in which a function or activity is being performed.

(b) A state inspector may not observe the preparation of the ballot of a voter not being assisted by an election officer.

(c) A state inspector shall report to the secretary of state any violation of law that the inspector observes.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 34.003. TRAVEL EXPENSES. Subject to specific legislative appropriation, the secretary of state may reimburse state inspectors for travel expenses in an amount determined by the secretary but not to exceed travel expenses allowable to state employees generally.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 34.004. INSPECTIONS BY SECRETARY OF STATE. The secretary of state or a member of the secretary's staff may make inspections in the same manner as state inspectors whether or not a violation of election laws is suspected.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 34.005. ACTION BY SECRETARY OF STATE. (a) The secretary of state may refer a reported violation of law for appropriate action to the attorney general, if the attorney general has jurisdiction, or to a prosecuting attorney having jurisdiction.

(b) If the secretary of state believes that a state inspector was unlawfully prevented or obstructed from the performance of the inspector's duties, the secretary of state may seek:

(1) injunctive relief under Section 273.081, including issuance of temporary orders;

(2) a writ of mandamus under Section 161.009 or 273.061; and

(3) any other remedy available under law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 4.11, eff. December 2, 2021.